Arkansas, session 2025, HB1091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES . There is hereby
established for the Department of Health Shared Services for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC007 SECRETARY OF HEALTH 1 GRADE SE05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Health for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
*MAH006*
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: seven (7)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Health -Shared
Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $225,306
(02) EXTRA HELP 132,867
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 67,328
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $425,501

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Health for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U002U DFA DEPUTY DIRECTOR AND CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U119U ADH DEP DIRECTOR-PUBLIC HEALTH PROGRAMS 2 GRADE SE03
(3) B017N ADH CHIEF SCIENTIST 2 GRADE SE02
(4) N033N DFA ADMINISTRATIVE SVCS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(5) U121U ADH HEALTH INFORMATION TECH DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(6) U026U ADH DIRECTOR 1 GRADE MP10
(7) L003N CHIEF PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 2 GRADE MP09
(8) L025N SENIOR PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 4 GRADE MP08
(9) L008N PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 1 GRADE MP07
(10) L011N DENTIST 1 GRADE MP06
(11) L014N DIRECTOR OF PHARMACY 1 GRADE MP06
(12) B143C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH VETERINARIAN 1 GRADE MP05
(13) L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 6 GRADE MP05
(14) L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 37 GRADE MP04
(15) L002C NURSING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE MP04
(16) L009C NURSE MANAGER 3 GRADE MP03
(17) L017C ADH AREA NURSING DIRECTOR 7 GRADE MP02
(18) L026C ADH NURSING PROGRAM COORD 19 GRADE MP02
(19) L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 1 GRADE MP02
(20) L022C NURSING CLINIC COORDINATOR 46 GRADE MP02
(21) L019C REGISTERED NURSE COORDINATOR 8 GRADE MP02
(22) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 295 GRADE MP01
(23) N017N ADH CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE IT11
(24) D023N ADH HIT TECHNICAL DIRECTOR 2 GRADE IT08
(25) D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT08
(26) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
(27) D024N ADH HIT INTERFACE DEVELOPER 2 GRADE IT07
(28) D035C COMPUTER SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT07
(29) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 7 GRADE IT07
(30) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT07
(31) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(32) D042C DATA WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(33) D040C GIS ANALYST 3 GRADE IT06
(34) D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST 6 GRADE IT06
(35) D016C SENIOR TECHNOLOGY ANALYST 3 GRADE IT06
(36) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 7 GRADE IT06
(37) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
(38) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 8 GRADE IT05
(39) D047C INFORMATION SYSTEMS BUSINESS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(40) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORD SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(41) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 29 GRADE IT05
(42) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 2 GRADE IT05
(43) D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST 2 GRADE IT05
(44) D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT04
(45) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(46) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(47) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 13 GRADE IT03
(48) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 4 GRADE IT02
(49) B001N ADH SENIOR SCIENTIST 1 GRADE GS15
(50) N064N ADH CENTER DIR-LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH 2 GRADE GS14
(51) N065N ADH CENTER DIRECTOR-HEALTH PROTECTION 2 GRADE GS14
(52) N097N ADH CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS14
(53) G009N ADH CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(54) N063N ADH EPIDEMIOLOGY OFFICER 5 GRADE GS14
(55) R001N ADH CHIEF HUMAN RESOURCES OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(56) B011N ADH DIR ENGINEERING 1 GRADE GS13
(57) N118N ADH DIR IN-HOME SERVICES 1 GRADE GS13
(58) P002N ADH DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS13
(59) N104N ADH DIRECTOR STATISTICS & VITAL RECORDS 1 GRADE GS13
(60) B138C ADH ENGINEER CHIEF 2 GRADE GS13
(61) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(62) N174N HEALTH INFORMATION TECH POLICY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS13
(63) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 2 GRADE GS13
(64) G026C ADH ASSOC CENTER DIR-MGMT & OPS 7 GRADE GS12
(65) L109C ADH CERTIFIED TUMOR REGISTRAR MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(66) L019N ADH CHIEF EPIDEMIOLOGIST 6 GRADE GS12
(67) N148N ADH GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS POLICY DIR 1 GRADE GS12
(68) N139N ADH MINORITY HLTH & HLTH DISPARITIES 1 GRADE GS12
(69) G049C ADH REGIONAL DIRECTOR 5 GRADE GS12
(70) G024C DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 2 GRADE GS12
(71) B015C ENGINEER SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS12
(72) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(73) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS12
(74) L013C ADH BRANCH MANAGER 12 GRADE GS11
(75) D106C ADH HEALTH INFO TECH SR SYS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(76) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(77) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(78) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(79) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 14 GRADE GS11
(80) L030C ADH DISTRICT MANAGER 14 GRADE GS10
(81) L014C ADH HIPAA PROGRAM CONSULTANT 1 GRADE GS10
(82) D115C ADH HIT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS10
(83) L016C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH ADMINISTRATOR 11 GRADE GS10
(84) L025C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF III 13 GRADE GS10
(85) L114C ADH RADIOACTIVE MATERIALS PGM SUPERV 1 GRADE GS10
(86) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 3 GRADE GS10
(87) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(88) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS10
(89) X013C ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(90) L099C EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPERVISOR 7 GRADE GS10
(91) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS09
(92) L023C ADH HEALTH FACILITIES SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(93) B044C ADH HEALTH PHYSICIST SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(94) B047C ADH LABORATORY MANAGER 14 GRADE GS09
(95) G238C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR III 4 GRADE GS09
(96) L029C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF II 19 GRADE GS09
(97) L115C ADH RADIOACTIVE MATERIALS PGM SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS09
(98) L112C ADH SUICIDE PREVENTION SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(99) R019C BUDGET MANAGER 10 GRADE GS09
(100) B042C ENGINEER 2 GRADE GS09
(101) L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 47 GRADE GS09
(102) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(103) B035C GEOLOGY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(104) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 8 GRADE GS09
(105) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(106) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 4 GRADE GS09
(107) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 6 GRADE GS08
(108) X039C ADH DIRECTOR OF COSMETOLOGY BOARD 1 GRADE GS08
(109) X043C ADH ENVIRONMENTAL SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS08
(110) B079C ADH HEALTH FACILITY LABORATORY SURVEYOR 3 GRADE GS08
(111) B063C ADH HEALTH PHYSICIST 8 GRADE GS08
(112) G116C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR II 11 GRADE GS08
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(113) L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I 12 GRADE GS08
(114) L113C ADH SUICIDE PREV CALL CENTER SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS08
(115) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 24 GRADE GS08
(116) X067C HEALTH FACILITIES SURVEYOR 2 GRADE GS08
(117) L043C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST III 47 GRADE GS08
(118) L035C NUTRITIONIST CONSULTANT 11 GRADE GS08
(119) L034C NUTRITIONIST SUPERVISOR 7 GRADE GS08
(120) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(121) X081C PLUMBING/HVACR INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS08
(122) B043C PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST 2 GRADE GS08
(123) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(124) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(125) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS08
(126) B126C SENIOR CHEMIST 18 GRADE GS08
(127) B127C SENIOR MICROBIOLOGIST 27 GRADE GS08
(128) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GRADE GS07
(129) E064C ADH CERTIFIED PUBLIC HEALTH EDUCATOR 5 GRADE GS07
(130) L054C ADH EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SUPV 3 GRADE GS07
(131) G143C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR I 18 GRADE GS07
(132) X060C ADH SR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST 17 GRADE GS07
(133) G138C AGENCY ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OFFICER 1 GRADE GS07
(134) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 4 GRADE GS07
(135) A081C AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS07
(136) B081C CHEMIST 13 GRADE GS07
(137) L049C DISEASE INTERVENTION SPEC SUPERVISOR 7 GRADE GS07
(138) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS07
(139) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 4 GRADE GS07
(140) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 1 GRADE GS07
(141) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 8 GRADE GS07
(142) L048C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST II 35 GRADE GS07
(143) B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 25 GRADE GS07
(144) L039C NUTRITIONIST 26 GRADE GS07
(145) A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(146) X096C PLUMBING INSPECTOR 10 GRADE GS07
(147) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 1 GRADE GS07
(148) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(149) X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(150) A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS07
(151) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(152) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS07
(153) G176C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(154) L065C ADH EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SPEC 6 GRADE GS06
(155) L063C ADH FAMILY CONSUMER SCIENCE SPECIALIST 24 GRADE GS06
(156) C017C ADH HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS06
(157) E047C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH EDUCATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(158) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 48 GRADE GS06
(159) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 10 GRADE GS06
(160) D076C COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(161) L058C DISEASE INTERVENTION SPECIALIST 30 GRADE GS06
(162) X102C ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST 116 GRADE GS06
(163) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 6 GRADE GS06
(164) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(165) L053C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST I 49 GRADE GS06
(166) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 7 GRADE GS06
(167) R029C HUMAN RESOURCES RECRUITER 1 GRADE GS06
(168) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(169) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 75 GRADE GS06
(170) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(171) M038C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(172) A084C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDIT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(173) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(174) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(175) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(176) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 2 GRADE GS06
(177) X191C ADH MASSAGE THERAPY INSPECTOR 1 GRADE GS05
(178) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(179) S041C BOILER OPERATOR 6 GRADE GS05
(180) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(181) V013C CENTRAL WAREHOUSE OPERATIONS MGR 2 GRADE GS05
(182) B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN 7 GRADE GS05
(183) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 15 GRADE GS05
(184) C030C HEALTH RECORDS SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS05
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(185) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 5 GRADE GS05
(186) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(187) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS05
(188) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 2 GRADE GS05
(189) D081C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS05
(190) X174C ADH COSMETOLOGY INSPECTOR 5 GRADE GS04
(191) L073C ADH LACTATION CONSULTANT 10 GRADE GS04
(192) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 96 GRADE GS04
(193) S040C CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(194) D088C EMERGENCY COMMUNICATION SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS04
(195) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 16 GRADE GS04
(196) L077C HEALTH SERVICES SPECIALIST II 313 GRADE GS04
(197) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 7 GRADE GS04
(198) B111C LABORATORY TECHNICIAN 14 GRADE GS04
(199) C083C MAIL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS04
(200) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(201) C044C MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST 9 GRADE GS04
(202) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS04
(203) V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS04
(204) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 35 GRADE GS03
(205) C070C DUPLICATION ASSISTANT 3 GRADE GS03
(206) L083C HEALTH SERVICES SPECIALIST I 8 GRADE GS03
(207) V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN 5 GRADE GS03
(208) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
(209) L088C NURSING AIDE/NURSING ASST I 3 GRADE GS02
(210) V028C WAREHOUSE WORKER 5 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2,218

SECTION 5. REGULAR SALARIES - TRAUMA SYSTEM. There is hereby
established for the Department of Health - Trauma System for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(1) L003N CHIEF PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 1 GRADE MP09
(2) L026C ADH NURSING PROGRAM COORD 1 GRADE MP02
(3) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 3 GRADE MP01
(4) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(5) L013C ADH BRANCH MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(6) L025C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF III 1 GRADE GS10
(7) L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 GRADE GS09
(8) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(9) E064C ADH CERTIFIED PUBLIC HEALTH EDUCATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(10) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(11) A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(12) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(13) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(14) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 18

SECTION 6. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Health - Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
hundred twenty-two (222) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 7. EXTRA HELP - TRAUMA SYSTEM. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Health - Trauma System for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
(2) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Health, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
and operating expenses, grants and aid, and refunds and reimbursements of the
Department of Health for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $122,602,914
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,965,813
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 44,743,807
(04) OVERTIME 111,500
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 84,524,208
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 801,026
(C) PROF. FEES 13,625,581
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,363,925
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) ADH GRANTS & AID 22,333,487
(07) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 7,613
(08) KIDNEY DISEASE PROGRAM 850,441
(09) BREAST CARE PROGRAM 8,039,563
(10) INFECTIOUS DISEASE CONTROL 30,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $330,969,878

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - TRAUMA SYSTEM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the Public
Health Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Health - Trauma System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,097,107
(02) EXTRA HELP 75,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 400,304
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 355,545
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 50,000
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) TRAUMA SYSTEM EXPENSES 24,237,291
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $26,215,247

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - HEALTH BUIDING AND LOCAL HEALTH GRANT
TRUST. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the State Health Building and Local Grant Trust Fund, for
acquisition, construction, and improvement of the State Health Building and
grants to local health units for construction, expansion and renovation by
the Department of Health - Health Building and Local Health Grant Trust for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) HEALTH BUILDING ACQUISITION,
CONSTRUCTION & RENOVATION & GRANTS TO
LOCAL HEALTH UNITS $1,950,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - NUCLEAR PLANNING GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the Arkansas
Nuclear Planning and Response Fund, for grants and aid for Nuclear Planning
by the Department of Health - Nuclear Planning Grants for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS FOR NUCLEAR PLANNING $325,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the
Emergency Medical Services Revolving Fund, for Emergency Medical Services
operating expenses and grants to licensed Emergency Medical Services as
provided by law by the Department of Health - Emergency Medical Services for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $60,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $60,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - WIC FOOD INSTRUMENTS - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for Women, Infant, and Children's
Food Instruments of the Department of Health - WIC Food Instruments - Cash
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WIC FOOD INSTRUMENTS $60,000,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - INTERPRETERS FOR DEAF AND HEARING IMPAIRED.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from
the Interpreters between Hearing Individuals and Individuals who are Deaf,
Deafblind, Hard of Hearing, or Oral Deaf Fund, for expenses of the Advisory
Board for Interpreters between Hearing Individuals and Individuals who are
Deaf, Deafblind, Hard of Hearing, or Oral Deaf of the Department of Health
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADVISORY BOARD EXPENSES $25,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - FULL INDEPENDENT PRACTICE CREDENTIALING.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
Fiscal Officer of the State, for the payment of personal services, operating
expenses, and for the payment of mileage and per diem of committee members
for attendance at meetings, briefings, and hearings of the Department of
Health - Full Independent Practice Credentialing Committee for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FULL INDEPENDENT PRACTICE
CREDENTIALING COMMITTEE $350,000

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PARKING
FEES. On July 1 of each year the Arkansas Department of Health shall pay
$50,000 from the Operations appropriation provided herein from non-general
revenue to War Memorial.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. INDIRECT
COST ALLOCATION FUND TRANSFERS. Subject to such procedures as may be
implemented by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the disbursing officer
for the Arkansas Department of Health is hereby authorized to transfer funds
to the Public Health Fund from other program funds of the agency in order to
reimburse for expenditures incurred for those programs.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD OF FUNDS.
(a) Except as authorized in subsection (c) of this section, the
Department of Health is authorized to carry forward any unspent funds
remaining in the Public Health Fund on June 30, 2024 2025 allocated for the
support of the Trauma System to be used for the same purposes in the next
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
fiscal year.
(b) Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized
herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026, the agency shall by written
statement set forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding
to the Office of Budget of the Department of Finance and Administration;
(2) The Office of Budget of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall report to the Legislative Council all amounts carried
forward by the September meeting of the Legislative Council or the Joint
Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the agency,
board, commission, or institution and the amount of funding carried forward,
the program name or line item, the funding source and a copy of the written
request set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;
(3) Each agency, board, commission, or institution shall provide
a written report to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
along with a written statement as to the current status of the project,
contract, purpose, etc., for which the carry forward was originally requested
no later than thirty (30) days prior to the time the agency, board,
commission, or institution presents its budget request to the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee, or both; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration
shall include all information obtained in subdivision (b)(3) of this section
in the budget manuals or a statement of non-compliance by the agency, board,
commission, or institution, or both.
(c) The Department of Health is authorized to transfer up to three
million seven hundred thousand dollars ($3,700,000) in carry forward funds to
be used in the next fiscal year at the discretion of the Director of the
Department of Health to:
(1) Enhance and integrate an emergency management system to
include trauma, stroke, and myocardial infarction; and
(2) Provide long acting reversible contraceptives through
services provided by the Department of Health local health units.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BREAST
CARE PROGRAM. The Arkansas Department of Health shall annually budget,
allocate, and expend for the Breast Care Program as appropriated in the
Operations Section in this Act, the sum of at least four million seven
hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($4,755,000) for Breast Cancer screening,
diagnosis, treatment and outreach expenses of the Breast Care Program.
The Arkansas Department of Health shall file an annual progress report by
each January 1 preceding a session of the General Assembly to the Co-Chairs
of the House and Senate Public Health Committee. This report shall include
amounts budgeted, allocated and expended for the Breast Care Program for
testing, diagnosis, treatment and outreach expenses.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHARED
SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a Shared
Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Health.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the
transfer of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the
date of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 21. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1091
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 22. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 23. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee







03-12-2025 15:28:39 MAH006